Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,115
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Education Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Educational institution means any public preschool, any public elementary school or secondary school, any educational service unit, and the State Department of Education; and

(2) Governing board means the duly constituted board of any public school system of elementary or secondary schools, any educational service unit board, and the State Board of Education.

Laws 1982, LB 628, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3002;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 119.